Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.115

Major lines common to University of Washington and Washington State University.

Except as provided in RCW 28B.30.058, the courses of instruction of both the University of Washington and Washington State University shall embrace as major lines, pharmacy, architecture, and forest management as distinguished from forest products and logging engineering which are exclusive to the University of Washington. These major lines shall be offered and taught at said institutions only.

[ 2015 c 6 s 2; 2009 c 207 s 1; 2003 c 82 s 1; 1985 c 218 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.115. Prior: 1963 c 23 s 2; 1961 c 71 s 2; prior: (i) 1917 c 10 s 8; RRS s 4539. (ii) 1917 c 10 s 4; RRS s 4535. Formerly RCW 28.76.080.]